District of Columbia statutes.
20-533

Powers and duties.

A special administrator shall have the duty and all powers necessary to collect, manage, and preserve the property, in addition to any other duties and powers authorized by the Court. Upon the appointment of a personal representative, the special administrator shall account for the property of the decedent.

History

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155

Section References

This section is referenced in § 20-526.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 20-533.